Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-532
Articles of merger.

In a merger under section 21-530, the articles of merger must:

(1) comply with sections 21-171 to 21-174; and

(2) include as an attachment the following records, each to become effective when the merger becomes effective:

(A) for a protected series of a merging company being terminated as a result of the merger, a statement of termination signed by the company;

(B) for a protected series of a nonsurviving company which after the merger will be a relocated protected series:

(i) a statement of relocation signed by the nonsurviving company which contains the name of the company and the name of the protected series before and after the merger; and

(ii) a statement of protected-series designation signed by the surviving company; and

(C) for a protected series being established by the surviving company as a result of the merger, a statement of designation signed by the company.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 33;

Laws 2019, LB78, § 17.